Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-183
Restrictions on approval of mergers,
conversions, and domestications.

(RULLCA 1014) (a) If a member of a constituent, converting,
or domesticating limited liability company will have personal liability with
respect to a surviving, converted, or domesticated organization, approval
or amendment of a plan of merger, conversion, or domestication are ineffective
without the consent of the member, unless:

(1) the company's operating
agreement provides for approval of a merger, conversion, or domestication
with the consent of fewer than all the members; and

(2) the member has consented to
the provision of the operating agreement.

(b) A member does not give the consent required by
subsection (a) of this section merely by consenting to a provision of the
operating agreement that permits the operating agreement to be amended with
the consent of fewer than all the members.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 83.